test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-Clex_olmoos_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - olmooš: # ok, MLO

    olmooš+N+Sg+Nom:  olmooš
    olmooš+N+Sg+Gen:  ulmuu
    olmooš+N+Sg+Acc:  ulmuu
    olmooš+N+Sg+Ill:  ulmui
    olmooš+N+Sg+Loc:  ulmust
    olmooš+N+Sg+Com: ulmuin
    olmooš+N+Sg+Abe:  ulmuuttáá
    olmooš+N+Ess: olmožin
    olmooš+N+Par: olmožid
    olmooš+N+Pl+Nom:  ulmuuh
    olmooš+N+Pl+Gen:  ulmui
    olmooš+N+Pl+Acc:  ulmuid
    olmooš+N+Pl+Ill:  ulmuid
    olmooš+N+Pl+Loc:  ulmuin
    olmooš+N+Pl+Com:  [ulmuiguin, ulmuigijn]
    olmooš+N+Pl+Abe:  ulmuittáá
